Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 8. Size and Weight Limits

§ 31-18-801.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Agricultural operations” means the raising and harvesting of their own crops or livestock in this state by farmers or ranchers, their exchange between farmers or ranchers or the transportation of implements of husbandry to or from farmers or ranchers by persons engaged in the business of selling or repairing such implements;

“Axle” means the common axis of rotation of one (1) or more wheels, whether power driven or freely rotating, and whether in one (1) or more segments, and regardless of the number of wheels carried thereon;

“Axle group” means an assemblage of two (2) or more consecutive axles considered together in determining their combined load effect on a bridge or pavement structure;

“Axle load” means the total load transmitted to the road by an assembly of two (2) or more wheels whose centers are in one (1) transverse vertical plane or may be included between two (2) parallel transverse vertical planes forty (40) inches apart extending across the full width of the vehicle;

“Axle measurement” means the distance between axles to the nearest foot. When fractional measurement is exactly one-half (1/2) foot, the next larger whole number shall be used;

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

“Cargo” means the items or freight to be moved, including items placed on or in a vehicle towed by a vehicle or a vehicle itself;

“Connecting mechanism” means an arrangement of parts interconnecting two (2) or more consecutive axles to a vehicle in such a manner as to equalize the load between axles;

“Department” means the department of transportation;

“Director” means the director of the department of transportation;

“Dummy axle” means an axle attached independently to a vehicle whose suspensions are not adjustable and do not articulate or substantially equalize the load and are so designed and placed as to indicate the appearance of a normal axle group;

“Forest products” means logs, poles, posts, rough lumber, wood chips, sawdust and any other product of the forest which will require further processing;

“Gross weight” means the total weight of a vehicle and vehicle combinations including the weight of any load carried in or on the vehicle and vehicle combinations;

“Height” means the total vertical dimension of any vehicle above the ground surface including any load or load-holding device thereon;

“Highway” means a public way maintained by the department for the purpose of vehicular travel, including rights-of-way or other interests in land, embankments, retaining walls, culverts, sluices, drainage structures, bridges, railroad-highway crossings, tunnels, signs, guardrails and protective structures;

“Interstate or national defense highway” means highways which are designated as part of the interstate system by the transportation commission which are signed and marked accordingly;

“Implement of husbandry” means a vehicle or vehicles manufactured or designed and used exclusively for the conduct of agricultural operations and only incidentally operated on or moved on highways;

“Length” means the total longitudinal dimension of any vehicle or combination of vehicles, including any load or load-holding device thereon, but excluding any device or appurtenance attached to the front or rear of a semitrailer or trailer whose function is related to the safety of, or efficient operation of the unit or contents. Excluded devices include but are not limited to air hose glad hands, fifth wheel slide plates, dock bumpers, air deflectors and refrigeration units. No excluded devices shall be designed or used for carrying cargo;

“Load” means a weight or quantity of anything resting upon something else regarded as its support;

“Motor vehicle” means a vehicle which is self-propelled or propelled by electric power obtained from overhead trolley wires but not operating on rails;

“Permit” means a written authorization to move or operate on a highway a vehicle or vehicle with a load of size or weight exceeding the limits as specified by statute, which are limited by this act [§§

31-18-801

through

31-18-808

] and regulations of the department;

“Primary and secondary highways” means highways which are designated as part of the primary or secondary system by the transportation commission which are signed and marked accordingly;

“Safety device” means any piece of equipment or mechanism, including rear view mirrors, pin pockets not to exceed three (3) inches on each side and other devices designated by the director, attached to a vehicle to assure its safe operation and to assure the safe movement of a load hauled by the vehicle;

“Semitrailer” means every vehicle of a trailer type not equipped with propelling power so designed for carrying property and used in conjunction with a motor vehicle that some part of its own weight and load rests upon or is carried by another vehicle;

“Single axle” means an assemblage of two (2) or more wheels, whose centers are in one (1) transverse vertical plane or may be included between two (2) parallel transverse vertical planes forty (40) inches apart extending across the full width of the vehicle;

“Single axle load” means the total load transmitted to the road by a single axle;

“Single vehicle” means one (1) vehicle or one (1) unit of a combination of vehicles as a truck-tractor, semitrailer or trailer;

“Tandem axle” means any two (2) or more consecutive load bearing axles whose centers are more than forty (40) inches but not more than ninety-six (96) inches apart and articulate from an attachment to the vehicle including a variable load suspension or connecting mechanism designed to distribute the load between axles;

“Tandem axle load” means the total weight transmitted to the road by two (2) or more consecutive axles whose centers may be included between parallel transverse vertical planes spaced more than forty (40) inches and not more than ninety-six (96) inches apart, extending the full width of the vehicle;

“Trailer” means every vehicle not equipped with propelling power, designed for carrying property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle which carries no part of the weight and load of a trailer on its own wheels;

“Truck” means a motor vehicle designed, used or maintained primarily for the transportation of property;

“Truck-tractor” means a motor vehicle designed and used primarily for drawing other vehicles but not for loads other than a part of the weight of the vehicles and load drawn. For the purpose of this article, a truck-tractor equipped with a dromedary unit shall be considered a part of the weight of the vehicle and not a load thereon and a truck-tractor and semitrailer engaged in the transportation of automobiles may transport motor vehicles on part of the power unit;

“Variable load suspension axle” means an axle that may be adjusted to vary the weight carried by the axle;

“Vehicle” means a device in, upon or by which any person or property may be transported or drawn upon a highway, except devices moved by human power or used exclusively upon rails or tracks;

“Vehicle combination” means any connected assemblage of a motor vehicle and one (1) or more other vehicles;

“Width” means the total outside transverse dimension of a vehicle including any load or load-holding devices thereon, but excluding approved safety devices and tire bulge due to load;

“Motor home” means a motor vehicle designed, constructed and equipped as a dwelling place, living abode or sleeping place, either permanently or temporarily, but excluding a motor vehicle carrying a camper;

“Recreational vehicle” means as defined in W.S. 31-16-101(a)(xxiii);

“Truck camper” means a portable unit constructed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, travel or camping use, consisting of a roof, floor and sides, designed to be loaded onto and unloaded from the bed of a pickup truck.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 257, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-217.2; Laws 1973, ch. 123, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-1001

; Laws 1979, ch. 19, § 1; 1980, ch. 32, § 1; 1983, ch. 108, § 1; 1984, ch. 2, § 1; 1987, ch. 71, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1993, ch. 68, § 3; 1998, ch. 46, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 123, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 31-18-802.
General requirements.

All vehicles operated on the highways of this state shall comply with the following:

Width — all highways:

No vehicle, unladen or with load or load-holding device thereon shall exceed one hundred two (102) inches in width. Notwithstanding the foregoing, appurtenances on noncommercial motor homes, house trailers and truck campers may exceed one hundred two (102) inches in width if they extend no further than the exterior rear view mirrors of the motor home, tow vehicle or pickup truck, in the case of a truck camper, provided such mirrors only extend the distance necessary to provide the required field of view for the vehicle before the appurtenances were attached.

Height — all highways:

No vehicle, unladen or with load or load-holding devices thereon, shall exceed fourteen (14) feet in height.

Notwithstanding paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection, implements and produce of husbandry of greater widths or greater heights may be moved in agricultural operations during daylight hours, without a permit or fee, but subject to and in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department for the protection of persons, property, highways and bridges. Regarding movement of implements of husbandry not exceeding sixteen (16) feet in width or height, the rules and regulations shall:

Not require the use of escort vehicles provided the implement is kept to the right of the center line;

Require the display of an oversize vehicle sign and warning lights as approved by the department.

Length - all highways, except as provided in 31-18-803(a):

No combination of vehicles shall consist of more than three (3) single vehicles. No single vehicle shall have an overall length in excess of sixty (60) feet;

In a truck-tractor semitrailer combination, no semitrailer shall exceed sixty (60) feet in length. In a truck-tractor, semitrailer, trailer combination or truck-tractor double semitrailer combination, the length of the semitrailer shall not exceed forty-eight (48) feet and the length of the trailer or second semitrailer shall not exceed forty (40) feet. The combined length of the semitrailer and trailer or semitrailer shall not exceed eighty-one (81) feet including connecting mechanisms. For any other combination of vehicles the overall length shall not exceed eighty-five (85) feet;

In a truck-tractor, semitrailer, trailer or double semitrailer combination, the heavier towed vehicle shall be directly behind the truck-tractor and the lighter towed vehicle shall be last if the weight difference between consecutive towed vehicles exceeds five thousand (5,000) pounds.

Weights:

The wheels of all vehicles except those operated at a speed of less than ten (10) miles per hour shall be equipped with pneumatic tires;

No wheel equipped with solid tires shall carry a load in excess of eight thousand (8,000) pounds;

No wheel shall carry a load in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds. No tire on a steering axle shall carry a load in excess of seven hundred fifty (750) pounds per inch of tire width and no other tire on a vehicle shall carry a load in excess of six hundred (600) pounds per inch of tire width. “Tire width” means the width stamped on the tire by the manufacturer;

No single axle shall carry a load in excess of twenty thousand (20,000) pounds;

No tandem axle shall carry a load in excess of thirty-six thousand (36,000) pounds and no one (1) axle of any group of two (2) consecutive axles shall exceed the weight permitted on a single axle;

No triple axle, consisting of three (3) consecutive load bearing axles that articulate from an attachment to the vehicle including a connecting mechanism or variable load suspension axle to keep all axles at or below legal limits, having a spacing between the first and third axles greater than ninety-six (96) inches and not more than one hundred two (102) inches, shall carry a load in excess of forty-two thousand (42,000) pounds;

Subject to the limitation imposed by the axle load, no vehicle or combination of vehicles shall be operated on the interstate or national defense highways exceeding the maximum weight allowed under federal law and unless in compliance with Table I corresponding to a distance in feet between the extremes of any axle groups measured longitudinally to the nearest foot except that vehicles with two (2) consecutive sets of tandem axles may carry a gross load of thirty-six thousand (36,000) pounds each if the distance between the first and last axles of the consecutive sets of tandem axles is thirty-six (36) feet or more;

Vehicles operating on primary and secondary highways may operate in accordance with Table I or Table II at the discretion of the operator as follows:

For vehicles operating under gross weight Table I, the total gross weight in pounds imposed on the highway by any group of two (2) or more consecutive axles on a vehicle or combination of vehicles shall not exceed the value given in gross weight Table I, corresponding to a distance in feet between the extremes of any axle groups measured longitudinally to the nearest foot except that two (2) consecutive sets of tandem axles may carry a gross load of thirty-six thousand (36,000) pounds each if the distance between the first and last axles of the consecutive sets of tandem axles is thirty-six (36) feet or more;

For vehicles operating under the provisions of gross weight Table II, the total gross weight in pounds imposed on the highway by a vehicle or combination of vehicles shall not exceed the value given in gross weight Table II, corresponding to the distance in feet between the extremes of the vehicle or combination of vehicles measured longitudinally to the nearest foot;

Vehicles with two (2) consecutive sets of tandem axles with a distance of less than twenty-two (22) feet between the first and last axles of the consecutive sets shall comply with gross weight Table I.

A variable load suspension axle shall produce a distribution of weight to prevent an axle or axle group from exceeding allowable weights as specified in this paragraph. Dummy axles shall not be considered in the determination of allowable weights;

The following general formula is applied in preparing gross weight Table I:

W = 500 [LN/(N
-
1)
+
12N
+
36]

Where: W = overall gross weight on any group of two (2) or more consecutive axles to the nearest five hundred (500) pounds.

L = distance in feet between extremes of any group of two (2) or more consecutive axles.

N = number of axles in the group under consideration.

GROSS WEIGHT TABLE I Distance in feet between the extremes of any group of two (2) or more consecutive axles Maximum gross weight in pounds carried on any group of two (2) or more consecutive axles 2 axles 3 axles 4 axles 5 axles 6 axles 7 axles 8 axles 9 ormore axles
4 36,000
5 36,000
6 36,000
7 36,000
8 36,000 42,000
9 39,000 42,500 10 40,000 43,500 11 44,000 12 45,000 50,000 13 45,500 50,500 14 46,500 51,500 15 47,000 52,000 16 48,000 52,500 58,000 17 48,500 53,500 58,500 18 49,500 54,000 59,000 19 50,000 54,500 60,000 20 51,000 55,500 60,500 66,000 21 51,500 56,000 61,000 66,500 22 52,500 56,500 61,500 67,000 23 53,000 57,500 62,500 68,000 24 54,000 58,000 63,000 68,500 74,000 25 54,500 58,500 63,500 69,000 74,500 26 55,500 59,500 64,000 69,500 75,000 27 56,000 60,000 65,000 70,000 76,000 28 57,000 60,500 65,500 71,000 76,500 82,000 29 57,500 61,500 66,000 71,500 77,000 82,500 30 58,500 62,000 66,500 72,000 77,500 83,000 31 59,000 62,500 67,500 72,500 78,000 83,500 32 60,000 63,500 68,000 73,000 78,500 84,500 90,000 33 64,000 68,500 74,000 79,000 85,000 90,500 34 64,500 69,000 74,500 80,000 85,500 91,000 35 65,500 70,000 75,000 80,500 86,000 91,500 36 Two (2) consecutive sets of tandem axles may carry 36,000 pounds each if the distance is 36 feet or more between the consecutive sets of tandem axles 66,000 70,500 75,500 81,000 86,500 92,000 37 66,500 71,000 76,000 81,500 87,000 93,000 38 67,500 72,000 77,000 82,000 87,500 93,500 39 68,000 72,500 77,500 82,500 88,500 94,000 40 68,500 73,000 78,000 83,500 89,000 94,500 41 69,500 73,500 78,500 84,000 89,500 95,000 42 70,000 74,000 79,000 84,500 90,000 95,500 43 70,500 75,000 80,000 85,000 90,500 96,000 44 71,500 75,500 80,500 85,500 91,000 96,500 45 72,000 76,000 81,000 86,000 91,500 97,500 46 72,500 76,500 81,500 87,000 92,500 98,000 47 73,500 77,500 82,000 87,500 93,000 98,500 48 74,000 78,000 83,000 88,000 93,500 99,000 49 74,500 78,500 83,500 88,500 94,000 99,500 50 75,500 79,000 84,000 89,000 94,500 100,000 51 76,000 80,000 84,500 89,500 95,000 100,500 52 76,500 80,500 85,000 90,500 95,500 101,000 53 77,500 81,000 86,000 91,000 96,500 102,000 54 78,000 81,500 86,500 91,500 97,000 102,500 55 78,500 82,500 87,000 92,000 97,500 103,000 56 79,500 83,000 87,500 92,500 98,000 103,500 57 80,000 83,500 88,000 93,000 98,500 104,000 58 84,000 89,000 94,000 99,000 104,500 59 85,000 89,500 94,500 99,500 105,000 60 85,500 90,000 95,000 100,500 105,500 61 86,000 90,500 95,500 101,000 106,000 62 87,000 91,000 96,000 101,500 107,000 63 87,500 92,000 97,000 102,000 107,500 64 88,000 92,500 97,500 102,500 108,000 65 88,500 93,000 98,000 103,000 108,500 66 89,000 93,500 98,500 104,000 109,000 67 90,000 94,000 99,000 104,500 110,000 68 90,500 95,000 99,500 105,000 110,500 69 91,000 95,500 100,000 105,500 111,000 70 92,000 96,000 101,000 106,000 111,500 71 92,500 96,500 101,500 106,500 112,000 72 93,000 97,000 102,000 107,000 112,500 73 93,500 98,000 102,500 107,500 113,000 74 94,500 98,500 103,000 108,500 113,500 75 95,000 99,000 104,000 109,000 114,000 76 95,500 99,500 104,500 109,500 115,000 77 96,000 100,000 105,000 110,000 115,500 78 97,000 101,000 105,500 110,500 116,000 79 97,500 101,500 106,000 111,000 116,500 80 98,000 102,000 106,500 111,500 117,000 81 98,500 102,500 107,000 112,000 82 99,000 103,000 108,000 113,000 83 100,000 104,000 108,500 113,500 84 104,500 109,000 114,000 85 105,000 109,500 114,500 86 105,500 110,000 115,000 87 106,000 111,000 115,500 88 107,000 111,500 116,000 89 107,500 112,000 117,000 90 108,000 112,500 91 108,500 113,000 92 109,000 113,500 93 110,000 114,000 94 110,500 115,000 95 or more 111,000 115,500

Click to view

GROSS WEIGHT TABLE II PRIMARY AND SECONDARY HIGHWAYS Distance in feet between the extremes of the first and last axle of any vehicle or combinations of vehicles Maximum gross weight in pounds 10 43,500 11 45,000 12 48,000 13 50,000 14 52,000 15 54,000 16 54,000 17 54,000 18 56,000 19 58,000 20 62,000 21 64,000 22 65,000 23 66,000 24 66,000 25 66,000 26 66,000 27 66,000 28 66,000 29 66,000 30 67,000 31 68,000 32 69,000 33 70,000 34 71,000 35 72,000 36 73,000 37 74,000 38 75,000 39 76,000 40 76,000 41 76,000 42 76,000 43 76,000 44 76,000 45 77,000 46 77,400 47 78,300 48 or more 80,000

Click to view

The director may reduce the maximum allowable axle loads and gross weight limits for specific highways or sections thereof or for bridges under his jurisdiction if the continued operation of vehicles or combinations of vehicles would create undue damage to the highways or bridges. Any person owning or operating a vehicle or combination of vehicles in violation of reduced load limits when posted or otherwise appropriately marked is liable for damage to the highway or bridge in question in addition to the penalties provided by law;

There is no obligation on the state to heighten any bridge, tunnel or other structure on highways because of the provisions of this act [§§

31-18-801

through

31-18-808

]. The director may reduce the size and weight limits of vehicles and loads on state and federal highways if, in his discretion, road conditions require;

A board of county commissioners may by resolution adopt any or all of the provisions of this act to apply to county roads under their jurisdiction. The sheriff shall have enforcement authority on county roads under W.S.

31-18-805

for provisions adopted.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 257, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 31-217.3; Laws 1973, ch. 123, § 1; 1977, ch. 129, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-5-1002; Laws 1983, ch. 108, § 1; 1984, ch. 46, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 76, § 1; 1989, ch. 179, § 1; 1991, ch. 94, § 1; 1993, ch. 68, § 3; ch. 98, § 1; 1998, ch. 46, § 1; 1999, ch. 123, § 1; 2007, ch. 126, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(iv) inserted “except as provided in 31-18-803(a)” at the end of the sentence.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(i)(B), (a)(ii)(B) or (a)(v)(I) or subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Limitation on weight of vehicle or load thereon with respect to the use of streets or highways, 75 ALR2d 376.

Measure and elements of damages for injury to bridge, 31 ALR5th 171.

§ 31-18-803.
Conditions for operating vehicles transporting other vehicles.

Vehicles used for transporting other vehicles may be operated singly, or in combinations by the towbar, saddlemount or full-mount methods, subject to the following terms and conditions:

No more than one (1) towbar may be used in any such combination;

Notwithstanding W.S.

31-5-1009

and 31-18-802(a)(iv), no more than three (3) saddlemounts may be used in any combination except additional vehicles may be transported when safely loaded upon the frame of a vehicle in a properly assembled saddlemount combination and the overall length of the saddlemount combination does not exceed ninety-seven (97) feet;

Towed vehicles in a triple saddlemount combination shall have brakes acting on all wheels which are in contact with the roadway;

All applicable rules of the department and safety regulations on coupling devices and towaway methods of the bureau of motor carriers safety, United States department of transportation shall be observed and complied with;

Any vehicle being towed without brakes and an operator shall be connected to the towing vehicle by a safe, solid connecting device to prevent slack between the vehicles.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 257, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 31-217.4; Laws 1975, ch. 111, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-1003

; Laws 1983, ch. 108, § 1; 1993, ch. 68, § 4; 2007, ch. 126, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(ii) substituted “Notwithstanding W.S.

31-5-1009

and 31-18-802(a)(iv), no” for “No” preceding “more than three (3)” and inserted “and the overall length of the saddlemount combination does not exceed ninety-seven (97) feet;” at the end of the sentence.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 4, renumbered this section, which was former §

31-5-1003

, effective July 1, 1993.

§ 31-18-804.
Permits for and certain highways to carry, overweight and oversize vehicles; government vehicles.

The director or his authorized representative may issue permits for separate movements or extended periods of movement effective for one (1) or more months, not to exceed ninety (90) days permitting hauling of forest products, baled hay or combine headers. No permit issued under this section shall be granted for any load of forest products exceeding one hundred twelve (112) inches in width or any load of baled hay or combine headers exceeding one hundred fifty (150) inches in width and fifteen (15) feet in height. No single component of the load may exceed one hundred two (102) inches in width. The fee for a single trip permit is fifteen dollars ($15.00). The fee for an extended period permit is fifty dollars ($50.00).

The director or his authorized representative may issue a permit exclusive of interstate highways for hauling of forest products, sugar beets, gravel, livestock and agricultural products hauled in trucks that cannot be weighed at point of loading at a weight which is not more than ten percent (10%) in excess of allowable axle weights and not more than five thousand (5,000) pounds in excess of gross weights allowed under gross weight Table I. The permit fee is fifteen dollars ($15.00) for a single trip permit not to exceed ninety-six (96) continuous hours. The permit fee is fifty dollars ($50.00) for any ninety (90) continuous days. If a truck hauling forest products, sugar beets, gravel, livestock or agricultural products exceeds the legal weight limitations, the truck shall be allowed to unload at its point of destination in this state if the point of destination is within one (1) mile of the truck’s location when the illegal weight limitation was determined, unless an immediate threat to public safety exists. No penalty for the first violation shall be imposed, but any subsequent violation shall be subject to the penalty provisions of W.S.

31-18-805

.

In special circumstances of individual movements of vehicles hauling single, multiple or readily divisible items which cannot be readily or safely dismantled or divided or which cannot be transported safely or without damage when dismantled or divided, the director or his authorized representative may upon application and good cause shown issue a permit in writing effective for a single trip by each permit authorizing the applicant to operate or move a vehicle or combination of vehicles of a width, height, length or weight of vehicle or load, exceeding the maximum specified in or authorized under W.S.

31-18-802

.

For movements of a vehicle without load, or meeting indivisible load requirements, or a trailer carrying a recreational boat that exceeds any maximum dimension or weight authorized under W.S.

31-18-802

, the director or his authorized representative may upon application issue a permit in writing effective for an extended period of time, not to exceed one (1) year, authorizing the movement of the vehicle, provided that the size does not exceed seventy-five (75) feet in length for a single vehicle and twelve (12) feet in width or fifteen (15) feet in height for a single vehicle or combination of vehicles. The permit fee for an oversize vehicle is fifty dollars ($50.00). The director or his authorized representative may upon application issue a permit effective for one (1) year, authorizing the commercial movement of one (1) or more motor homes, house trailers or truck campers that exceed the maximum width authorized under W.S.

31-18-802

(a)(i)(A). A copy of the permit shall be carried with the vehicle. The fee for such a permit shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00). Notwithstanding subsections (e) through (t) of this section, no additional permit requirements shall be imposed upon the commercial movement of such vehicles if such vehicles comply with W.S. 31-18-802(a)(i)(A). The permit fee for an overweight vehicle is as prescribed in subsection (g) of this section. Extended period permits are not authorized for transportable homes as defined in W.S.

31-1-101

.

The application for any permit under this section shall specifically describe the applicant, individual or company, the vehicle or load to be operated or moved, and the particular highway to be used and whether the permit is requested for a single trip or for extended period operation. Each permit shall contain the following provisions: duration of permit, description of load or loads to be moved, section standards which are to be exceeded and the amount of excess authorized, description of equipment, route to be traveled and required operating procedures. Every permit issued under this act [§§

31-18-801

through

31-18-808

] shall be carried with the vehicles or combination of vehicles to which it refers and shall be open to inspection by any authorized agent of the state of Wyoming. Permission may be verbally issued by telephone or otherwise, granting the applicant authorization to proceed to the nearest permit issuing facility to be weighed and measured and to obtain the permit. Unless otherwise authorized by the director or his authorized representative, permits shall be obtained prior to operating any oversize or overweight vehicles on the highways of this state. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to permit a vehicle that is overweight or oversize and has not obtained a permit or permission in advance to be operated on the highways of this state. Except as provided in W.S. 31-18-805(b) and this subsection, the operator shall be required to unload the excess weight, reduce the excess size or otherwise bring the load within permissible limits and pay all fees for overweight or oversize under this act for distance traveled in addition to penalties provided by law.

When an oversize single trip permit is issued, the fee is twenty-five dollars ($25.00). Should any vehicle including load exceed the dimensions of fifteen (15) feet in width or fifteen (15) feet in height or any single vehicle including load exceed seventy-five (75) feet in length, an additional fee shall be paid in excess of the above limitation computed at the rate of three cents ($.03) for each foot or fraction thereof for each mile traveled on the highways.

When an overweight permit is issued, the fee is six cents ($.06) for each ton or fraction thereof of weight in excess of the weight limitation under W.S.

31-18-802

for each mile traveled on the highways. In no event shall the fee be less than forty dollars ($40.00) for the permit. A permit under this section for loads exceeding eighty (80) tons shall not be issued until the permittee has paid all costs incurred by the state to determine routing, structure, highway capability to withstand the load and the cost incurred by sending personnel to accompany the movement of the load.

In addition to other permits authorized in this act [§§

31-18-801

through

31-18-808

], the director may issue permits to be completed by the applicant. These permits shall authorize separate movements of items that cannot be readily dismantled or divided, or safely transported if dismantled or divided. The applicant is required to complete a separate permit prior to each separate movement. The fee for the permit is that established in subsections (f) and (g) of this section.

The director may promulgate rules and regulations as to the terms and conditions of the permits issued under this article. Alteration of any word or figure on the face of a permit will void the permit immediately and will subject the permit to confiscation by the inspecting officer.

The funds paid for permits for the use of highways shall be credited to the state highway fund.

Permits issued under this act [§§

31-18-801

through

31-18-808

] shall be issued under conditions deemed necessary for travel safety and highway system protection as to time of day and day of week, route, equipment, speed and otherwise as may be determined by the director or his authorized representative.

Certain highways may be designated to carry vehicles of greater weight, size and number of vehicles than given in this article if it has been determined by the governor or director that a situation of economic hardship exists or that the general welfare of the state of Wyoming or another state would benefit from the designation. Vehicles operating on the designated highways shall obtain a permit under this section in accordance with rules adopted by the director. Provisions for the designation may be made if the director has determined:

That the operation of the vehicles under this subsection would relieve a situation that is detrimental to the economy or general welfare of the state or another state; and

By engineering evaluation that the highways and bridges in question have geometrical and structural capacity adequate to accommodate the vehicles and allow their operation safely and compatibly with other traffic on the highways; and

That federal highway funds will not be withdrawn by this provision.

The director or his authorized representative is authorized to examine and audit the records of any person having applied for and having received overweight and oversize permits to determine the accuracy of these permits and reports, or to determine fees due in the event no report is made. The records shall not be destroyed for a period of two (2) years or until the records have been examined and audited, whichever occurs first.

In determining permit weights of vehicles or combinations of vehicles, a variable load suspension axle may be counted as load bearing, provided that the variable load suspension axle that is capable of producing a distribution of weight to prevent an axle or axle group from exceeding maximum allowable weights in accordance with department rules and regulations.

Multiple piece loads of a size or weight greater than that authorized in W.S.

31-18-802

are prohibited except as authorized in this section.

Oversize vehicles with a proper permit may be used to transport loads of legal size, legal weight, oversize indivisible loads or overweight indivisible loads.

Vehicles owned and operated by government agencies shall comply with the provisions of this article and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article, except that no permit shall be required for oversize or overweight movements made in compliance with this section.

The director or his authorized representative may issue permits for vehicles at weights in excess of limits allowed in W.S. 31-18-802(a)(vi), but meeting axle and bridge formula specifications in section 127 of title 23, United States Code and pursuant to section 335 of the Department of Transportation and Related Agencies Appropriations Act, 1991 (104 Stat. 2186) and sections 1023(d)(I)(A) and (1)(B) of the Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act of 1991. Permit fees for vehicles operating under this provision shall be paid in accordance with rules adopted by the director or his authorized representative and shall be credited to the highway fund. A power unit receiving a permit under this subsection shall be capable of maintaining a speed of twenty-five (25) miles per hour on a grade of five percent (5%) or less when fully loaded.

Nothing in this article shall be interpreted to authorize the operation of triple trailers as prohibited by W.S.

31-5-1009

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 257, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 31-217.5; Laws 1975, ch. 77, § 1; ch. 146, § 1; 1977, ch. 14, § 1; ch. 38, § 1; ch. 129, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-1004

; Laws 1979, ch. 19, § 1; ch. 108, § 1; 1983, ch. 108, § 1; 1984, ch. 46, § 1; 1989, ch. 179, § 1; 1991, ch. 147, § 1; 1993, ch. 68, § 3; ch. 98, § 1; 1996, ch. 50, § 1; 1998, ch. 46, § 1; 1999, ch. 123, § 1; 2008, ch. 23, § 1; 2013 ch. 121, § 1, effective March 13, 2013.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” for “fifteen dollars ($15.00)” in (f); in (g), substituted “six cents ($.06)” for “four cents ($.04),” and substituted “forty dollars ($40.00)” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00).”

The 2013 amendment,

rewrote introductory paragraph (n) and (n)(i); and added (u).

Laws 2013, ch. 121, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 27, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act. —

Section 1023(d)(I)(A) and (B) of the federal Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act of 1991, referred to in the first sentence in subsection (t), appears in 23 U.S.C. § 127(d)(1).

§ 31-18-805.
Penalties for violations; permit where vehicle or load cannot be dismantled; enforcement; fines.

Any person who violates this article, rules and regulations promulgated under it or the conditions of any permit issued under it is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable except where otherwise provided in this article, by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

Where the vehicle or load cannot be readily dismantled to meet the provisions of this act [§§

31-18-801

through

31-18-808

], the director or his authorized representative may issue a permit as authorized under this act.

A driver of any vehicle, or combination of vehicles upon demand of any state trooper having reason to believe that the weight of any vehicle or combination, including load, if any, is unlawful, shall stop and submit the vehicle or combination of vehicles and any load thereon to a weighing at any state owned or leased scales not to exceed five (5) miles from the declared route of travel, unless the vehicle has been weighed at a port of entry with the same load. The driver shall comply with the directions of the trooper to obtain the total weight or measurement of the load and vehicle.

If a vehicle or combination of vehicles does not exceed the gross weight provisions of Table I or Table II, but does exceed the axle limits in an amount not over two thousand (2,000) pounds, or does exceed either the width limits of W.S. 31-18-802(a)(i) or the length limits of W.S. 31-18-802(a)(iv) by not more than twelve (12) inches, the cargo may be repositioned by the operator to comply with the legal limits and be allowed to proceed without penalty. In the case of a load that has shifted during transit and cannot be reasonably repositioned to meet legal limits, a permit may be issued.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the fine for exceeding weight limitations is as follows:

EXCESS WEIGHT (LBS) FINE 0 — 2,000 $ 25.00 2,001 — 4,000 75.00 4,001 — 6,000 125.00 6,001 — 8,000 150.00 8,001 — 10,000 200.00 10,001 — 12,000 300.00 12,001 — 14,000 400.00 14,001 — 16,000 500.00 16,001 — 18,000 600.00 18,001 — 20,000 700.00 Over 20,000 1,000.00

Click to view

Plus an additional two hundred dollars ($200.00) for each one thousand (1,000) pounds or fraction thereof exceeding twenty thousand (20,000) pounds over the legal limits.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 257, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 31-217.6; W.S. 1977, § 31-5-1005; Laws 1983, ch. 108, § 1; 1993, ch. 68, § 3; ch. 98, § 1; 1998, ch. 46, § 1; 1999, ch. 3, § 1; 2011, ch. 192, § 1.

Cross references. —

For Gross Weight Tables I and II, see §

31-18-802

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), substituted “one hundred dollars ($100.00)” for “fifty dollars ($50.00)”; and in (e), increased the fines for exceeding weight limitations, and substituted “two hundred dollars ($200.00)” for “one hundred dollars ($100.00)” in the second paragraph.